Utah statutes.
78B-6-904.   Sales -- Disposition of surplus money.

If there is surplus money remaining after payment of the amount due on the mortgage, lien or encumbrance, with costs, the court may order the amount paid to the person entitled to it.  In the meantime the court may direct it to be deposited with the court.

